Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2012YH (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 364 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 136B.6 Radon test kits ââ 1 appropriation. 2 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 3 June 30, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, there 4 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 5 department of health and human services the amount of twenty 6 thousand dollars to be used to make radon test kits available, 7 free of charge, to homeowners and renters in the state. 8 2. The department shall designate a radon testing 9 laboratory to supply, distribute, and analyze radon test kits. 10 To be the laboratory designated by the department, the radon 11 testing laboratory must agree to provide data obtained from 12 analysis of the radon test kits to the department upon request. 13 3. The department shall provide a link on the departmentâs 14 internet site for homeowners and renters in the state to order 15 radon test kits. 16